Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
CHAPTER 5 Government Transparency and Campaign Finance

Cross references.

Ethics and Efficiency in Government Act, T. 28, C. 11.

Codes of ethics and conflicts of interest relating to public officers and employees, T. 45, C. 10.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 957, § 1 repealed the former chapter, the “Campaign and Financial Disclosure Act”, and enacted the present chapter. The former chapter consisted of §§

21-5-1

through

21-5-5

,

21-5-5

.1,

21-5-6

through

21-5-1

0,

21-5-10

.1,

21-5-11

,

21-5-11

.1, and

21-5-12

through

21-5-14

and was based on Ga. L. 1974, p. 155, §§ 1 through 10; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1120, §§ 1 through 3, 3A, 4, 5 through 7, 7A, 9, 10, 12, 12A; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1423, §§ 1 through 5; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1302, §§ 1 through 10, 12 through 19; Ga. L. 1979, p. 602, §§ 1 through 6; Ga. L. 1980, p. 724, §§ 1 through 3; Ga. L. 1981, p. 851, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 21; Ga. L. 1984, p. 133, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 764, §§ 1 to 7; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1100, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 206, § 1; and Ga. L. 1986, p. 855, § 8.

Ga. L. 1992, p. 1075, § 1, effective April 6, 1992, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that that Act is entitled “The Public Officials Conduct and Lobbyist Disclosure Act of 1992.”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Organization, practice and procedure, and other provisions, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Ethics Commission, Chapter 189-1 et seq.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of administrative law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 17 (1986).

For annual survey of local government law, see 40 Mercer L. Rev. 303 (1988).

For article, “Georgia’s New Ethics Laws: A Summary of the Changes Relevant to Lobbyists and Legislators,” see 11 Ga. St. B. J. 22 (No. 4, 2005).

For article, “Georgia’s New Ethics Laws: A Summary of the Changes Relevant to Candidates, Campaigns and Contributors,” see 11 Ga. St. B. J. 16 (No. 6, 2006).

For article, “SB 221: The Creation of Election Leadership Committees,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 155 (2021).

For note on 1990 amendment of Code sections within this chapter, see 7 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 279 (1990).